en: Denture Adhesives
xx: Denture Adhesives
cs: Lepidla na zubní náhrady
da: Klæbemidler til proteser
de: Zahnprothesehaftmittel
es: Adhesivos para dentadura
fr: Adhésifs pour dentiers
it: Adesivi dentiera
ja: 義歯・入れ歯安定剤
nl: Kleefmiddelen voor kunstgebitten
no: Proteselim
pl: Kleje do protez
pt: Adesivos para dentadura
ru: Адгезивы для зубных протезов
sv: Protesfixativ
tr: Protez Diş Yapıştırıcıları

en: Denture Cleaners
xx: Denture Cleaners
cs: Přípravky na čištění umělého chrupu
da: Proteserensere
de: Gebissreiniger
es: Limpiadores de dentaduras postizas
fr: Nettoyants pour prothèses dentaires
it: Detergenti per dentiere
ja: 義歯・入れ歯洗浄剤
nl: Prothesereinigers
no: Proteserens
pl: Środki do czyszczenia protez
pt: Limpadores de próteses
ru: Очистители для зубных протезов
sv: Rengöring av tandproteser
tr: Protez Diş Temizleyiciler

en: Denture Repair Kits
xx: Denture Repair Kits
cs: Sady na opravy zubních protéz
da: Tandplejesæt
de: Reparatursets für Zahnprothesen
es: Kits de reparación de dentaduras
fr: Kits de réparation de dentiers
it: Kit per la riparazione dei denti
ja: 義歯・入れ歯修理キット
nl: Reparatiesets voor kunstgebitten
no: Verktøysett for proteser
pl: Zestawy do naprawy protez
pt: Kits de reparos para dentaduras
ru: Наборы для ремонта зубных протезов
sv: Reparationskit för tandproteser
tr: Protez Onarım Setleri

en: Dentures
xx: Dentures
cs: Umělý chrup
da: Proteser
de: Zahnersatz
es: Dentaduras postizas
fr: Prothèses dentaires
it: Dentiere
ja: 義歯・入れ歯
nl: Kunstgebitten
no: Tannproteser
pl: Protezy
pt: Dentaduras
ru: Зубные протезы
sv: Tandproteser
tr: Protez Dişler

en: Gum Stimulators
xx: Gum Stimulators
cs: Stimulátory dásní
da: Tandkødsstimulatorer
de: Zahnfleischstimulierende Geräte
es: Estimuladores de encías
fr: Stimulateurs de gencives
it: Stimolatori gengivali
ja: 歯ぐき用マッサージブラシ
nl: Tandvleesstimulatoren
no: Tannkjøttstimulatorer
pl: Stymulatory do masażu dziąseł
pt: Massageadores de gengiva
ru: Межзубные стимуляторы
sv: Tandköttsmassage
tr: Diş Eti Uyarıcılar

en: Mouthwash
xx: Mouthwash
cs: Ústní voda
da: Mundskyl
de: Mundwasser
es: Enjuagues bucales
fr: Bains de bouche
it: Collutorio
ja: マウスウォッシュ
nl: Mondwater
no: Munnskyll
pl: Płyny do płukania jamy ustnej
pt: Antisséptico bucal
ru: Ополаскиватели для полости рта
sv: Munvatten
tr: Ağız Çalkalama Suları

en: Orthodontic Appliance Cases
xx: Orthodontic Appliance Cases
cs: Pouzdra na zubní protézy a rovnátka
da: Etuier til bøjler\, tandbeskyttere og proteser
de: Spangen-\, Gebiss- & Aufbissschienendosen
es: Fundas para ortodoncias
fr: Boîtes pour appareils dentaires
it: Custodie per dentiere
ja: 歯列矯正器具用ケース
nl: Orthodontische opbergboxen
no: Etuier til ortodontiske apparaturer
pl: Pudełeczka na aparaty ortodontyczne
pt: Estojos para aparelhos ortodônticos
ru: Футляры для ортодонтических аппаратов
sv: Behållare för tandregleringsprodukter
tr: Ortodontik Cihaz Kılıfları

en: Power Flossers
xx: Power Flossers
cs: Nástavec na dentální nitě
da: Elektrisk tandtråd
de: Interdentalreiniger
es: Aplicador de hilo dental eléctrico
fr: Fils dentaires électriques
it: Power flosser
ja: 電動デンタルフロス
nl: Flossmaterialen
no: Munndusjer
pl: Flossery
pt: Fio-dental elétrico
ru: Автоматические флоссеры
sv: Eltandtrådsapparater
tr: Elektrikli Plak ve Tartar Temizleyici

en: Teeth Whiteners
xx: Teeth Whiteners
cs: Přípravky na bělení zubů
da: Tandblegning
de: Zahnaufhellung
es: Blanqueadores dentales
fr: Blanchisseurs de dents
it: Sbiancante per denti
ja: ホワイトニング
nl: Tandbleekmiddelen
no: Tannbleking
pl: Wybielacze zębów
pt: Branqueadores dentais
ru: Средства для отбеливания зубов
sv: Tandblekning
tr: Diş Beyazlatıcılar

en: Tongue Scrapers
xx: Tongue Scrapers
cs: Škrabky na jazyk
da: Tungeskrabere
de: Zungenreiniger
es: Limpiadores linguales
fr: Gratte-langue
it: Spazzolini per la lingua
ja: 舌ブラシ
nl: Tongschrapers
no: Tungeskraper
pl: Szczoteczki do czyszczenia języka
pt: Limpadores de língua
ru: Скребки для языка
sv: Tungskrapor
tr: Dil Fırçaları

en: Toothbrush Accessories
xx: Toothbrush Accessories
cs: Zubní kartáčky – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til tandbørster
de: Zahnbürstenzubehör
es: Accesorios para cepillos de dientes
fr: Accessoires de brosses à dents
it: Accessori per spazzolini
ja: 歯ブラシ用品
nl: Tandenborstelaccessoires
no: Tannbørstetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do szczoteczek do zębów
pt: Acessórios para escova de dente
ru: Принадлежности для зубных щёток
sv: Tillbehör till tandborstar
tr: Diş Fırçası Aksesuarları

en: Toothbrush Covers
xx: Toothbrush Covers
cs: Kryty na zubní kartáčky
da: Hylstre til tandbørster
de: Zahnbürstenhüllen
es: Fundas para cepillos de dientes
fr: Étuis pour brosses à dents
it: Protezioni per spazzolini da denti
ja: 歯ブラシカバー
nl: Tandenborstelhoesjes
no: Tannbørstedeksler
pl: Osłony na szczoteczki do zębów
pt: Capas para escovas de dente
ru: Чехлы для зубных щёток
sv: Tandborstskydd
tr: Diş Fırçası Kutuları

en: Toothbrush Replacement Heads
xx: Toothbrush Replacement Heads
cs: Náhradní hlavice pro zubní kartáčky
da: Udskiftelige hoveder til tandbørster
de: Ersatzköpfe für Zahnbürsten
es: Cabezales de repuesto para cepillos de dientes
fr: Brossettes de rechange
it: Testine ricambio spazzolini
ja: 歯ブラシ用替えブラシ
nl: Vervangende opzetstukken voor tandenborstels
no: Tannbørstehoder
pl: Końcówki do szczoteczek do zębów
pt: Cabeças de reposição para escovas de dente
ru: Сменные насадки для зубных щёток
sv: Ersättningshuvuden för tandborstar
tr: Diş Fırçası Yedek Başları

en: Toothbrush Sanitizers
xx: Toothbrush Sanitizers
cs: Dezinfekce na zubní kartáčky
da: Sterilisering til tandbørster
de: Zahnbürstendesinfektionsmittel
es: Desinfectantes para cepillos de dientes
fr: Assainisseurs pour brosses à dents
it: Igienizzanti spazzolini
ja: 歯ブラシ除菌器
nl: Schoonmaakmiddelen voor tandenborstels
no: Tannbørsterensere
pl: Sterylizatory do szczoteczek do zębów
pt: Desinfetantes para escovas de dente
ru: Дезинфицирующие средства для зубных щёток
sv: Tandborstrengörare
tr: Diş Fırçası Sterilizatörleri

en: Toothbrushes
xx: Toothbrushes
cs: Zubní kartáčky
da: Tandbørster
de: Zahnbürsten
es: Cepillos de dientes
fr: Brosses à dents
it: Spazzolini
ja: 歯ブラシ
nl: Tandenborstels
no: Tannbørster
pl: Szczoteczki do zębów
pt: Escovas de dente
ru: Зубные щётки
sv: Tandborstar
tr: Diş Fırçaları

en: Toothpaste
xx: Toothpaste
cs: Zubní pasty
da: Tandpasta
de: Zahnpasta
es: Pasta de dientes
fr: Dentifrice
it: Dentifricio
ja: 歯磨き粉
nl: Tandpasta
no: Tannkrem
pl: Pasty do zębów
pt: Pasta de dente
ru: Зубные пасты
sv: Tandkräm
tr: Diş Macunları

en: Toothpaste Squeezers & Dispensers
xx: Toothpaste Squeezers & Dispensers
cs: Zásobníky a dávkovače zubní pasty
da: Holdere og klemmer til tandpasta
de: Zahnpastapressen & -spender
es: Dispensadores y exprimidores de pasta de dientes
fr: Pousse-dentifrice et distributeurs de dentifrice
it: Spremidentifricio e dispenser
ja: 歯磨き粉チューブ絞り
nl: Tandpastadispensers en squeezers
no: Tannkremklemmere og -dispensere
pl: Wyciskacze i dozowniki do pasty do zębów
pt: Espremedores e suportes para pasta de dentes
ru: Выдавливатели и дозаторы зубной пасты
sv: Tandkrämsklämmor och doserare
tr: Diş Macunu Sıkıcı ve Dağıtıcılar

en: Toothpicks
xx: Toothpicks
cs: Párátka
da: Tandstikkere
de: Zahnstocher
es: Palillos de dientes
fr: Cure-dents
it: Stuzzicadenti
ja: 楊枝
nl: Tandenstokers
no: Tannpirkere
pl: Wykałaczki
pt: Palitos de dente
ru: Зубочистки
sv: Tandpetare
tr: Kürdanlar

en: Personal Lubricants
xx: Personal Lubricants
cs: Lubrikanty
da: Glidecremer
de: Gleitmittel
es: Lubricantes íntimos
fr: Lubrifiants personnels
it: Lubrificanti personali
ja: 潤滑ゼリー・ローション
nl: Glijmiddelen
no: Glidemidler
pl: Żele intymne
pt: Lubrificantes pessoais
ru: Гигиенические смазки
sv: Glidmedel
tr: Kayganlaştırıcılar

en: Shaving & Grooming
xx: Shaving & Grooming
cs: Holení a péče o vzhled
da: Barbering og personlig pleje
de: Rasieren & Trimmen
es: Afeitado y arreglo personal
fr: Rasage et soins
it: Insaponatura e rasatura
ja: シェービング・脱毛
nl: Scheren en gezichtsbeharing
no: Barbering og stell
pl: Golenie i strzyżenie
pt: Barbearia e embelezamento
ru: Средства для бритья
sv: Rakning och ansning
tr: Tıraş ve Kişisel Bakım